Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 43-117 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


No municipality shall enact or enforce an ordinance authorizing


the conditional reversion of the zoning of a property.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2748 YG 1/15/2026 1:26:31 PM











Req. No. 2748 Page 1